Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6207.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. Many anadromous fish stocks in Washington state are sensitive or endangered and have, as a result, been supplemented through hatchery programs. As budget constraints hit the governments who operate the hatcheries, the stocks continue to suffer. The legislature finds that the department of fish and wildlife shall maintain the production of anadromous hatchery fish regardless of hatchery closures.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 77.95 RCW to read as follows:The department shall not reduce the production of any anadromous fisheries stock from the closure of hatcheries and must offset the loss of production from the closure of a hatchery with increased production in other facilities.--- END ---